Massachusetts, session 194th, H5578.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding subsection (b) of section 13 of chapter 4 of the General
Laws, wherever the town of Topsfield or its committees, boards, commissions, departments or
offices, are required by general or special law, by-law or judicial order to publish a legal notice
in a newspaper or newspaper of general circulation, such requirement may be met through
posting or publishing such notice in any of the following ways:
(i) print newspaper of local or general circulation;
(ii) newspaper website;
(iii) website reporting local news and opinions which satisfy all criteria for digital
publication as established in said subsection (c) of said section 13 of said chapter 4;
(iv) statewide website that may be maintained as a repository for such notices; or
of 2

(v) town-wide website that may be maintained as a repository for such notices.
SECTION 2. Nothing set forth in this act shall be construed to alter or amend the time or
timing of publication of legal notices set forth in the General Laws.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2